Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF840.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2674HV (1) 91 dg/ko H.F. 840 Section 1. Section 347.14, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 7A. Operate a child care facility 3 established under section 347.27 in conjunction with the 4 hospital. The board of trustees may contract with a person 5 licensed to operate a child care facility under chapter 237A to 6 operate the hospitalâs child care facility. 7 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 347.27 County hospital child care 8 facility. 9 A county hospital may establish a child care facility as 10 defined in section 237A.1. The operation, maintenance, and 11 improvement of a child care facility established by a county 12 hospital shall comply with the requirements of chapter 237A. 13